Mississippi, session 2026, HB97.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  In order to improve efficiencies and consistencies for health care providers, payers and patients, payers for health care services authorized to do business in the State of Mississippi by the Mississippi Insurance Department are required to follow the same criteria for determining the reasonableness and necessity of hospital inpatient admissions as those used under Medicare Part A commonly referred to as the Two-Midnight Rule. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.